Utah statutes.
75-1-311.   Consent to jurisdiction.
By submitting an application for informal probate or appointment or a petition
for formal probate, adjudication of intestacy, or appointment the applicant or
petitioner subjects himself to the jurisdiction of the court in all matters
arising under this code. Notice of any proceeding sought to be maintained
against the applicant or petitioner pursuant to his submission to jurisdiction
shall be delivered to him or mailed to him by ordinary first-class mail at his
address as it is known to the moving party or as listed in the application or
petition or as thereafter reported to the court.
